Maine, session 132, LD777.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11404, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 280, §2, is amended
by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner may terminate this open season at any time in an area if, in the
commissioner's opinion, an immediate emergency action is necessary due to adverse
weather conditions or severe hunting pressure. The length of the special muzzle-loading
season is as follows must be the same in all regions of the State and established by rule.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §11404, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 280, §2, is amended
by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner shall establish by rule the length of the special muzzle-loading season.
The commissioner may establish seasons of different lengths in different regions of the
State. The season may extend for no more than 12 hunting days in any part of the State.